Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-944
Cemetery association;
formation; when authorized.

Whenever, in cities
of the second class and villages, one-fifth of the resident lot owners of
any cemetery under the control of such city or
village shall so desire it, it shall be lawful for such lot owners
to associate themselves into and form a cemetery association as defined
in section 12-501.

Laws 1887, c. 15, § 1, p. 330;

R.S.1913, § 5171;

C.S.1922, § 4358;

C.S.1929, § 17-556;

R.S.1943, § 17-944;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 14.

The section does not apply to cities having over five thousand inhabitants. State ex rel. Wyuka Cemetery Assn. v. Bartling, 23 Neb. 421, 36 N.W. 811 (1888).